lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_weakGH.txt
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megteni  PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megteni  PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegteni PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!            ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mun               PostInflIII; ^[All.Pl]:^%{.w.%}nun               PostInflIII; ^[All.Du]:^%{.w.%}gnun              PostInflIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflIII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflIII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemnun    PostInflIII;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflIII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflIII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemnnun   PostInflIII;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegnun PostInflIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpenun    PostInflIII;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpegnun   PostInflIII;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflIII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflIII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesinun  PostInflIII;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflIII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflIII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegnun PostInflIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}anun      PostInflIII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}anun      PostInflIII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkenun    PostInflIII;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIII;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gkenun    PostInflIII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itnun     PostInflIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}minun     PostInflIII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}minun     PostInflIII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gminun    PostInflIII;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meggnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meggnun   PostInflIII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeggnun  PostInflIII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megnun    PostInflIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megnun    PostInflIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegnun   PostInflIII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megtenun  PostInflIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megtenun  PostInflIII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegtenun PostInflIII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------------|
!              PERLATIVE (vialis)                |
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^%{.w.%}kun                 PostInflIII; ^[Prl.Pl]:^%{.w.%}tgun                PostInflIII; ^[Prl.Du]:^%{.w.%}gnekun               PostInflIII;
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemkun       PostInflIII;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemteggun    PostInflIII;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflIII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegnegun  PostInflIII;
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpegun       PostInflIII;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesigun     PostInflIII;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflIII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegnegun  PostInflIII;
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}akun        PostInflIII; ^[Prl.Sg.3SgPoss]:^%{.c.%}akun        PostInflIII; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkenkun      PostInflIII;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itgun       PostInflIII; ^[Prl.Sg.3PlPoss]:^%{.c.%}itgun       PostInflIII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itgun        PostInflIII;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gkenkun     PostInflIII; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}akun        PostInflIII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itgun        PostInflIII;
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mikun       PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}mikun       PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmikun       PostInflIII;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megteggun   PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megteggun   PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegteggun   PostInflIII;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megtegnegun PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megtegnegun PostInflIII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegtegnegun PostInflIII;
!------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!              EQUATIVE (equalis)               |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^%{.w.%}tun                PostInflIII; ^[Equ.Pl]:^%{.w.%}stun               PostInflIII; ^[Equ.Du]:^%{.w.%}gestun              PostInflIII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtun      PostInflIII;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtestun   PostInflIII;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflIII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegestun PostInflIII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetun      PostInflIII;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesistun   PostInflIII;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflIII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegetun  PostInflIII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}atun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.Sg.3SgPoss]:^%{.c.%}atun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gketun      PostInflIII;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.Sg.3PlPoss]:^%{.c.%}itun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itun        PostInflIII;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gketun     PostInflIII; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itun       PostInflIII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itun        PostInflIII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mitun      PostInflIII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}mitun      PostInflIII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmitun      PostInflIII;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megestun   PostInflIII; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megestun   PostInflIII;  ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegestun  PostInflIII;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megestun   PostInflIII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megestun   PostInflIII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegestun   PostInflIII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                    |
! ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                    |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.w.%}m               VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.w.%}n               VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^%{.w.%}gn              VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemn    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemnn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpen    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}an      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}an      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gken    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gken    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itn     VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
